Maryland, session 2025, HB0572.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0572*

HOUSE BILL 572
Article – Health – General
13–3101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Private or public entity” means a health care provider, local health
department, community–based organization, substance abuse treatment organization, or
other person that addresses medical or social issues related to drug addiction.
(e) “Standing order” means a written instruction for the prescribing and
dispensing of an opioid overdose reversal drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration in accordance with § 13–3106 of this subtitle.
13–3104.
An authorized private or public entity shall enter into a written agreement with a
licensed health care provider with prescribing authority to establish protocols for the
prescribing and dispensing of an opioid overdose reversal drug approved by the federal Food
and Drug Administration to any individual in accordance with this subtitle.
13–3106.
(a) A licensed health care provider with prescribing authority may prescribe and
dispense an opioid overdose reversal drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration to an individual who:
(1) Is believed by the licensed health care provider to be at risk of
experiencing an opioid overdose; or
(2) Is in a position to assist an individual at risk of experiencing an opioid
overdose.
(b) (1) A licensed health care provider with prescribing authority may
prescribe and dispense opioid overdose reversal drugs approved by the federal Food and
Drug Administration by issuing a standing order if the licensed health care provider:
(i) Is employed by the Department or a local health department; or
(ii) Has a written agreement with an authorized private or public
entity under § 13–3104 of this subtitle.
(2) WHEN ISSUING A STANDING ORDER FOR AN OPIOID OVERDOSE
REVERSAL DRUG UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A LICENSED HEALTH
CARE PROVIDER SHALL ALLOW THE INDIVIDUAL TO CHOOSE ANY FORMULATION OF
ANY OPIOID OVERDOSE REVERSAL DRUG APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND
DRUG ADMINISTRATION.

HOUSE BILL 572 3
[(2)] (3) A licensed health care provider with prescribing authority who
issues a standing order under paragraph (1) of this subsection may delegate the dispensing
of opioid overdose reversal drugs approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration to
an employee or a volunteer of an authorized private or public entity in accordance with a
written agreement under § 13–3104 of this subtitle.
[(3)] (4) Any licensed health care provider who has dispensing authority
also may dispense an opioid overdose reversal drug approved by the federal Food and Drug
Administration to any individual in accordance with a standing order issued by a licensed
health care provider with prescribing authority in accordance with this subsection.
(c) A pharmacist may dispense opioid overdose reversal drugs approved by the
federal Food and Drug Administration in accordance with a therapy management contract
under Title 12, Subtitle 6A of the Health Occupations Article.
13–3110.
AN AUTHORIZED PRIVATE OR PUBLIC ENTITY THAT PRESCRIBES AND
DISPENSES OPIOID OVERDOSE REVERSAL DRUGS MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO KEEP
IN STOCK OR DISPENSE ALL OPIOID OVERDOSE REVERSAL DRUGS APPROVED BY THE
FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.